Louisiana, session 2026, HB106.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 14:91.16 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
7 §91.16. Unlawful distribution of melatonin to children
8 A. It is unlawful for any person to provide a child with a melatonin sleep aid
9 without prior written consent of the child's parent or legal guardian.
10 B. Whoever violates the provisions of this Section shall be fined not more
11 than one thousand dollars or imprisoned for not more than six months, or both.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.